Wyoming, session 2026, SF0073.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 24-16-101 and 24-16-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 16
HIGHWAY TOLLING

ARTICLE 1
SF0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0347
HIGHWAY TOLLING PROGRAM AND IMPLEMENTATION

24-16-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Commission" means the Wyoming
transportation commission;

(ii) "Department" means the department of
transportation;

(iii) "Highway" means a public road or street
now or subsequently designated as part of the state highway
system, including rights-of-way, bridges, tunnels, signs
and drainage infrastructure.

24-16-102. Highway tolling program; implementation;
requirements; report; rulemaking.

(a) The department shall have authority to create a
highway tolling program.

SF0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0347
(b) The department may develop any documentation
required by federal law to implement tolling on a highway
including planning, financing, construction, operation,
maintenance and improvements. Once the department develops
the documentation required to toll a highway, the
department shall submit the documentation to the commission
and the federal highway administration for approval.

(c) Upon receiving approval from both the commission
and the federal highway administration, the department
shall, not later than thirty (30) days after receiving the
last approval, report to the joint transportation, highways
and military affairs interim committee.

(d) The commission and the department shall not
implement tolling on any highway unless the relevant
documentation has been approved pursuant to subsection (b)
of this section and the legislature enacts legislation
either granting general authority for the highway tolling
program to implement tolls on highways or authorizing
tolling for one (1) or more specific highways.

SF0073

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0347
(e) The commission and the department shall have the
authority to promulgate rules as necessary to implement the
highway tolling program.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0073